Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1836
Authority; acquisition of property.

The authority is authorized and empowered, directly or by and through an elementary or secondary school, as its agent, to acquire by purchase, gift, or devise, such lands, structures, property, real or personal, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, and including existing facilities of an elementary or secondary school, as it may deem necessary or convenient for the construction, acquisition, or operation of a project, upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between the authority and the owner thereof, and to take title thereto in the name of the authority or in the name of an elementary or secondary school as its agent.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 36.